Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.160

Monthly financial report—Report to be printed.

The state treasurer shall cause all such reports to be printed as other public documents are printed and the approval of no other officer of the state shall be necessary in carrying out the purposes of RCW 43.08.150.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.08.160. Prior: 1947 c 32 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11019-2.]